Maryland, session 2026, HB0818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–106.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Foster care recipient” means an individual who:
1. Was placed in an out–of–home placement by the
Department of Human Services; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0818*

HOUSE BILL 818
2. A. Resided in an out–of–home placement on the
individual’s 18th birthday or at the time the individual graduated from high school or
successfully completed a GED; or
B. Resided in an out–of–home placement on or after the
individual’s 13th birthday for at least 1 year and was placed into guardianship, adopted, or
reunited with at least one of the individual’s parents.
(ii) “Foster care recipient” includes a younger sibling of an individual
described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph if the younger sibling is concurrently placed
into guardianship or adopted out of an out–of–home placement by the same guardianship
or adoptive family.
(3) “Homeless youth” means a child or youth who:
(i) Has had a consistent presence in the State for at least 1 year
before enrollment in a public institution of higher education that is documented by school,
employment, or other records; and
(ii) Has been verified as a homeless child or youth, as defined by the
federal McKinney–Vento Homeless Assistance Act, at any time during the 24 months
immediately preceding the student’s enrollment in a public institution of higher education
or while the student is enrolled in a public institution of higher education by:
1. The Director or designee of a governmental or nonprofit
entity that receives public or private funding to provide services to persons experiencing
homelessness;
2. A local educational agency liaison for children and youth
experiencing homelessness designated in accordance with the federal McKinney–Vento
Homeless Assistance Act;
3. A school counselor;
4. A school social worker;
5. The Director or a designee of a federal or State outreach
and student services program designed to identify and provide services to economically
disadvantaged individuals;
6. The Director or a designee of a federal or State program
for providing early awareness and readiness for undergraduate programs; or
7. The Director or a designee of the Director of a financial aid
department at the public institution of higher education in which the youth is enrolled or
seeks to enroll.

HOUSE BILL 818 3
(4) “Out–of–home placement” has the meaning stated in § 5–501 of the
Family Law Article.
(5) (I) “ROOM AND BOARD” MEANS THE CHARGES IMPOSED FOR
ON–CAMPUS HOUSING AND FOOD OR ESTIMATED FOR OFF–CAMPUS HOUSING AND
FOOD BY A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(II) “ROOM AND BOARD” DOES NOT INCLUDE TRANSPORTATION
COSTS OR OTHER PERSONAL LIVING COSTS.
[(5)] (6) (i) “Tuition” means the charges imposed by a public
institution of higher education for enrollment at the institution.
(ii) “Tuition” includes charges for registration and all fees required
as a condition of enrollment in credit–bearing and noncredit courses offered during the fall,
winter, spring, or summer term.
[(6)] (7) “Vocational certificate” means a certificate or license awarded by
a public institution of higher education on completion of a course of study that prepares an
individual to work in a career field by taking credit–bearing courses or noncredit courses.
(b) (1) A foster care recipient or homeless youth is exempt from paying any
tuition at a public institution of higher education, regardless of that foster care recipient’s
or homeless youth’s receipt of any scholarship or grant if:
(i) The foster care recipient or homeless youth is enrolled at the
institution on or before the date that the foster care recipient or homeless youth reaches
the age of 25 years;
(ii) The foster care recipient or homeless youth is enrolled as a
candidate for a vocational certificate, an associate’s degree, or a bachelor’s degree; and
(iii) The foster care recipient or homeless youth has filed for federal
and State financial aid.
(2) If a foster care recipient or homeless youth receives a scholarship or
grant for postsecondary study and is enrolled before the recipient’s 25th birthday as a
candidate for a vocational certificate, an associate’s degree, or bachelor’s degree at a public
institution of higher education, the scholarship or grant may not be applied to the tuition
for the foster care recipient or homeless youth.
(3) A foster care recipient or homeless youth who is exempt from tuition
under this section continues to be exempt until the earlier of:
(i) 10 years after first enrolling as a candidate for an associate’s
degree or a bachelor’s degree at a public institution of higher education in the State; or

HOUSE BILL 818
(ii) The date that the foster care recipient or homeless youth is
awarded a bachelor’s degree.
(4) If a public institution of higher education provides on–campus housing,
a foster care recipient or homeless youth who is exempt from tuition under this section shall
receive priority consideration for on–campus housing at the institution at which the
student is enrolled.
(C) (1) IF A FOSTER CARE RECIPIENT OR HOMELESS YOUTH IS EXEMPT
FROM PAYING TUITION AT A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND ENROLLS AS A STUDENT AT THE
INSTITUTION, THE PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE
FREE OF CHARGE TO THE FOSTER CARE RECIPIENT OR HOMELESS YOUTH THE
FOLLOWING ADDITIONAL BENEFITS:
(I) 1. ON–CAMPUS ROOM AND BOARD; OR
2. 100% OF THE PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION’S ESTIMATED COST OF ROOM AND BOARD FOR LIVING OFF CAMPUS; AND
(II) REQUIRED BOOKS, COURSE MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND
EQUIPMENT.
(2) IF A FOSTER CARE RECIPIENT OR HOMELESS YOUTH RECEIVES A
SCHOLARSHIP OR GRANT FOR POSTSECONDARY STUDY, THE SCHOLARSHIP OR
GRANT MAY BE APPLIED TO COVER ALL OR PART OF THE COSTS OF ROOM AND
BOARD OR REQUIRED BOOKS, COURSE MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND EQUIPMENT FOR
THE FOSTER CARE RECIPIENT OR HOMELESS YOUTH.
[(c)] (D) (1) If a public institution of higher education determines that a
student is a homeless youth, on request of the student, a public institution of higher
education shall notify any public institution of higher education in which the student
subsequently enrolls of the student’s designation as a homeless youth.
(2) If a public institution of higher education receives notice of a student’s
designation as a homeless youth under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the public
institution of higher education shall designate the student as a homeless youth.
[(d)] (E) Each public institution of higher education shall:
(1) (i) Designate a homeless and foster student liaison within its
financial aid office or another appropriate office within the institution;

HOUSE BILL 818 5
(ii) Ensure that the homeless and foster student liaison has
expertise in the financial aid eligibility of homeless and foster students; and
(iii) Include as part of the homeless and foster student liaison’s duties
providing assistance to homeless and foster students in applying for federal and State
financial aid or other assistance for which they may be eligible;
(2) Inform current and prospective students about the homeless and foster
student liaison and the services the liaison provides; and
(3) (i) Make the application for the tuition exemption AND
ACCOMPANYING BENEFITS established under this section available to prospective and
current students; and
(ii) Notify students of the availability of the application.
[(e)] (F) (1) Each public institution of higher education shall establish a
process for a foster care recipient or homeless youth to appeal a denial of [a tuition
exemption application] AN APPLICATION FOR A TUITION EXEMPTION AND THE
ACCOMPANYING BENEFITS.
(2) The appeal process shall include:
(i) Written notification to the foster care recipient or homeless youth
of the right to appeal;
(ii) A timely opportunity for the foster care recipient or homeless
youth to be heard; and
(iii) A written decision indicating the outcome of the appeal and the
reason for the outcome within 30 days of submission of the appeal.
[(f)] (G) (1) On or before June 1 of each year, each public institution of higher
education in the State shall report to the Commission on the aggregate and disaggregate
number of foster care recipients and homeless youth, including data disaggregated by age,
race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, and gender identity, who:
(i) Received a tuition exemption AND THE ACCOMPANYING
BENEFITS under this section during the prior academic year;
(ii) Applied for but did not receive a tuition exemption AND THE
ACCOMPANYING BENEFITS under this section during the prior academic year and the
reason for the denial;
(iii) Previously received a tuition exemption AND THE
ACCOMPANYING BENEFITS under this section at any point during their enrollment at the

HOUSE BILL 818
institution but did not receive the tuition exemption AND ACCOMPANYING BENEFITS
during the prior academic year and the reason for not continuing to receive the exemption
AND ACCOMPANYING BENEFITS;
(iv) Earned a bachelor’s degree, an associate’s degree, or a vocational
certificate from the institution during the prior academic year; and
(v) Filed an appeal in accordance with subsection [(e)] (F) of this
section, including the outcome of each appeal and the reason for each appeal denial.
(2) On or before June 1 each year, each public institution of higher
education shall submit to the Commission a brief description of any forms used in
conjunction with the tuition exemption AND ACCOMPANYING BENEFITS established
under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.